Washington statutes.
RCW 18.22.220

Violations—Penalty.

Every person violating, or failing to comply with, the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor.

[ 1955 c 149 s 10; 1917 c 38 s 21; RRS s 10094.]